Utah statutes.
34-23-209.   Age certificates issued by schools -- Responsibility of employers.

(1)  All public and private schools and school districts within the state shall cooperate with employers or prospective employers by issuing age certificates or lists of students or recent students showing their dates of birth according to school records.

(2)  Such age certificates do not relieve employers of full responsibility for complying with all laws and rules pertaining to the employment of minors.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 1990 General Session

